District of Columbia statutes.
1-631.03

Disclosure of personnel information.

It is the policy of the District government to make personnel information in its possession or under its control available upon request to appropriate personnel and law-enforcement authorities, except if such disclosure would constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy or is prohibited under law or rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3103, 25 DCR 5740
1981 Ed., § 1-632.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-361.3.